District of Columbia statutes.
15-367

Effect of recognition of foreign-country judgment.

If the court in a proceeding under § 15-366 finds that the foreign-country judgment is entitled to recognition under this subchapter, to the extent that the foreign-country judgment grants or denies recovery of a sum of money, the foreign-country judgment is:

(1)

Conclusive between the parties to the same extent as the judgment of a sister state entitled to full faith and credit in the District of Columbia would be conclusive; and

(2)

Enforceable in the same manner and to the same extent as a judgment rendered in the District of Columbia.

History

Feb. 24, 2012, D.C. Law 19-86, § 2(b), 58 DCR 11186

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 7 of the Uniform Foreign-Country Money Judgments Recognition Act.